src/pronouns/pronouns.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +Pron +Person +Poss +Intero +Demo +Subj +Refl +DirObj +IndirObj +Disj +PP1S +PP2S +PP3S +PP1P +PP2P +PP3P +Mas +Fem +Sg +Pl

LEXICON Root
je+Pron+Person+Subj+PP1S+Sg:je	#;
je+Pron+Person+Subj+PP1S+Sg:j'	#;
je+Pron+Person+Refl+PP1S+Sg:me	#;
je+Pron+Person+Refl+PP1S+Sg:m'	#;
je+Pron+Person+DirObj+PP1S+Sg:me	#;
je+Pron+Person+DirObj+PP1S+Sg:m'	#;
je+Pron+Person+IndirObj+PP1S+Sg:me	#;
je+Pron+Person+IndirObj+PP1S+Sg:m'	#;
je+Pron+Person+Disj+PP1S+Sg:moi	#;

tu+Pron+Person+Subj+PP2S+Sg:tu	#;
tu+Pron+Person+Refl+PP2S+Sg:te	#;
tu+Pron+Person+Refl+PP2S+Sg:t'	#;
tu+Pron+Person+DirObj+PP2S+Sg:te	#;
tu+Pron+Person+DirObj+PP2S+Sg:t'	#;
tu+Pron+Person+IndirObj+PP2S+Sg:te	#;
tu+Pron+Person+IndirObj+PP2S+Sg:t'	#;
tu+Pron+Person+Disj+PP2S+Sg:toi	#;

il+Pron+Person+Subj+PP3S+Sg:il	#;
il+Pron+Person+Refl+PP3S+Sg:se	#;
il+Pron+Person+Refl+PP3S+Sg:s'	#;
il+Pron+Person+DirObj+PP3S+Sg:le	#;
il+Pron+Person+DirObj+PP3S+Sg:l'	#;
il+Pron+Person+DirObj+PP3S+Sg:en	#;
il+Pron+Person+IndirObj+PP3S+Sg:lui	#;
il+Pron+Person+IndirObj+PP3S+Sg:y	#;
il+Pron+Person+Disj+PP3S+Sg:lui	#;

elle+Pron+Person+Subj+PP3S+Sg:elle	#;
elle+Pron+Person+Refl+PP3S+Sg:se	#;
elle+Pron+Person+DirObj+PP3S+Sg:la	#;
elle+Pron+Person+DirObj+PP3S+Sg:en	#;
elle+Pron+Person+IndirObj+PP3S+Sg:lui	#;
elle+Pron+Person+IndirObj+PP3S+Sg:y	#;
elle+Pron+Person+Disj+PP3S+Sg:elle	#;

on+Pron+Person+Subj+PP3S+Sg:on	#;
on+Pron+Person+Refl+PP3S+Sg:se	#;
on+Pron+Person+Refl+PP3S+Sg:s'	#;
on+Pron+Person+Disj+PP3S+Sg:soi	#;

nous+Pron+Person+Subj+PP1P+Pl:nous	#;
nous+Pron+Person+Refl+PP1P+Pl:nous	#;
nous+Pron+Person+DirObj+PP1P+Pl:nous	#;
nous+Pron+Person+IndirObj+PP1P+Pl:nous	#;
nous+Pron+Person+Disj+PP1P+Pl:nous	#;

vous+Pron+Person+Subj+PP2P+Pl:vous	#;
vous+Pron+Person+Refl+PP2P+Pl:vous	#;
vous+Pron+Person+DirObj+PP2P+Pl:vous	#;
vous+Pron+Person+IndirObj+PP2P+Pl:vous	#;
vous+Pron+Person+Disj+PP2P+Pl:vous	#;

ils+Pron+Person+Subj+PP3P+Pl:ils	#;
ils+Pron+Person+Refl+PP3P+Pl:se	#;
ils+Pron+Person+Refl+PP3P+Pl:s'	#;
ils+Pron+Person+DirObj+PP3P+Pl:les	#;
ils+Pron+Person+DirObj+PP3P+Pl:en	#;
ils+Pron+Person+IndirObj+PP3P+Pl:leur	#;
ils+Pron+Person+IndirObj+PP3P+Pl:y	#;
ils+Pron+Person+Disj+PP3P+Pl:eux	#;

elles+Pron+Person+Subj+PP3P+Pl:elles	#;
elles+Pron+Person+Refl+PP3P+Pl:se	#;
elles+Pron+Person+Refl+PP3P+Pl:s'	#;
elles+Pron+Person+DirObj+PP3P+Pl:les	#;
elles+Pron+Person+DirObj+PP3P+Pl:en	#;
elles+Pron+Person+IndirObj+PP3P+Pl:leur	#;
elles+Pron+Person+IndirObj+PP3P+Pl:y	#;
elles+Pron+Person+Disj+PP3P+Pl:elles	#;

mien+Pron+Poss+PP1S+Mas+Sg:mien	#;
mien+Pron+Poss+PP1S+Fem+Sg:mienne	#;
mien+Pron+Poss+PP1S+Mas+Pl:miens	#;
mien+Pron+Poss+PP1S+Fem+Pl:miennes	#;

nôtre+Pron+Poss+PP1P+Mas+Sg:nôtre	#;
nôtre+Pron+Poss+PP1P+Fem+Sg:nôtre	#;
nôtre+Pron+Poss+PP1P+Mas+Pl:nôtres	#;
nôtre+Pron+Poss+PP1P+Fem+Pl:nôtres	#;

tien+Pron+Poss+PP2S+Mas+Sg:tien	#;
tien+Pron+Poss+PP2S+Fem+Sg:tienne	#;
tien+Pron+Poss+PP2S+Mas+Pl:tiens	#;
tien+Pron+Poss+PP2S+Fem+Pl:tiennes	#;

vôtre+Pron+Poss+PP2P+Mas+Sg:vôtre	#;
vôtre+Pron+Poss+PP2P+Fem+Sg:vôtre	#;
vôtre+Pron+Poss+PP2P+Mas+Pl:vôtres	#;
vôtre+Pron+Poss+PP2P+Fem+Pl:vôtres	#;

sien+Pron+Poss+PP3S+Mas+Sg:sien	#;
sien+Pron+Poss+PP3S+Fem+Sg:sienne	#;
sien+Pron+Poss+PP3S+Mas+Pl:siens	#;
sien+Pron+Poss+PP3S+Fem+Pl:siennes	#;

leur+Pron+Poss+PP3P+Mas+Sg:leur	#;
leur+Pron+Poss+PP3P+Fem+Sg:leur	#;
leur+Pron+Poss+PP3P+Mas+Pl:leurs	#;
leur+Pron+Poss+PP3P+Fem+Pl:leurs	#;

que+Pron+Intero:que	#;
que+Pron+Intero:qu'	#;
quoi+Pron+Intero:quoi	#;
qui+Pron+Intero:qui	#;
lequel+Pron+Intero+Mas+Sg:lequel	#;
lequel+Pron+Intero+Fem+Sg:laquelle	#;
lequel+Pron+Intero+Mas+Pl:lesquels	#;
lequel+Pron+Intero+Fem+Pl:lesquelles	#;
dont+Pron+Intero+Fem+Pl:dont	#;

ceci+Pron+Demo:ceci	#;
cela+Pron+Demo:cela	#;
ça+Pron+Demo:ça	#;

celui+Pron+Demo+Mas+Sg:celui	#;
celui+Pron+Demo+Fem+Sg:celle	#;
celui+Pron+Demo+Mas+Pl:ceux	#;
celui+Pron+Demo+Fem+Pl:celles	#;
